lt_LT.aff
FLAG num
SFX 6253 Y 2
SFX 6253 yti yti/547 . 349
SFX 6253 ytis ytis/547 . 349

SFX 6254 Y 2
SFX 6254 yti yti/548 . 349
SFX 6254 ytis ytis/548 . 349

SFX 6255 Y 2
SFX 6255 yti yti/549 . 349
SFX 6255 ytis ytis/549 . 349

SFX 6256 Y 2
SFX 6256 yti yti/550 . 349
SFX 6256 ytis ytis/550 . 349

SFX 6257 Y 2
SFX 6257 yti yti/551 . 349
SFX 6257 ytis ytis/551 . 349

SFX 6258 Y 2
SFX 6258 yti yti/552 . 349
SFX 6258 ytis ytis/552 . 349

SFX 6259 Y 2
SFX 6259 yti yti/553 . 349
SFX 6259 ytis ytis/553 . 349

SFX 6270 Y 2
SFX 6270 yti ija/554 . 350
SFX 6270 ytis ijasi/554 . 350

SFX 6271 Y 2
SFX 6271 yti ija/555 . 350
SFX 6271 ytis ijasi/555 . 350

SFX 6272 Y 2
SFX 6272 yti ija/556 . 350
SFX 6272 ytis ijasi/556 . 350

SFX 6273 Y 2
SFX 6273 yti ija/557 . 350
SFX 6273 ytis ijasi/557 . 350

SFX 6274 Y 2
SFX 6274 yti ija/558 . 350
SFX 6274 ytis ijasi/558 . 350

SFX 6275 Y 2
SFX 6275 yti ija/559 . 350
SFX 6275 ytis ijasi/559 . 350

SFX 6276 Y 2
SFX 6276 yti ija/560 . 350
SFX 6276 ytis ijasi/560 . 350

SFX 6277 Y 2
SFX 6277 yti ija/561 . 350
SFX 6277 ytis ijasi/561 . 350

SFX 6278 Y 2
SFX 6278 yti ija/562 . 350
SFX 6278 ytis ijasi/562 . 350

SFX 6288 Y 1
SFX 6288 yti ijie/563 . 350

SFX 6289 Y 1
SFX 6289 ytis ijie/564 . 350

SFX 6290 Y 2
SFX 6290 yti ijo/568 . 351
SFX 6290 ytis ijosi/568 . 351

SFX 6291 Y 2
SFX 6291 yti ijo/569 . 351
SFX 6291 ytis ijosi/569 . 351

SFX 6292 Y 2
SFX 6292 yti ijo/570 . 351
SFX 6292 ytis ijosi/570 . 351

SFX 6296 Y 2
SFX 6296 ti ti/544 . 349
SFX 6296 tis tis/544 . 349

SFX 6297 Y 2
SFX 6297 ti ti/545 . 349
SFX 6297 tis tis/545 . 349

SFX 6298 Y 2
SFX 6298 ti ti/546 . 349
SFX 6298 tis tis/546 . 349

SFX 6299 Y 2
SFX 6299 ti ti/547 . 349
SFX 6299 tis tis/547 . 349

SFX 6300 Y 2
SFX 6300 ti ti/548 . 349
SFX 6300 tis tis/548 . 349

SFX 6301 Y 2
SFX 6301 ti ti/549 . 349
SFX 6301 tis tis/549 . 349

SFX 6302 Y 2
SFX 6302 ti ti/550 . 349
SFX 6302 tis tis/550 . 349

SFX 6303 Y 2
SFX 6303 ti ti/551 . 349
SFX 6303 tis tis/551 . 349

SFX 6304 Y 2
SFX 6304 ti ti/552 . 349
SFX 6304 tis tis/552 . 349

SFX 6305 Y 2
SFX 6305 ti ti/553 . 349
SFX 6305 tis tis/553 . 349

SFX 6316 Y 2
SFX 6316 ti a/554 . 350
SFX 6316 tis asi/554 . 350

SFX 6317 Y 2
SFX 6317 ti a/555 . 350
SFX 6317 tis asi/555 . 350

SFX 6318 Y 2
SFX 6318 ti a/556 . 350
SFX 6318 tis asi/556 . 350

SFX 6319 Y 2
SFX 6319 ti a/557 . 350
SFX 6319 tis asi/557 . 350

SFX 6320 Y 2
SFX 6320 ti a/558 . 350
SFX 6320 tis asi/558 . 350

SFX 6321 Y 2
SFX 6321 ti a/559 . 350
SFX 6321 tis asi/559 . 350

SFX 6322 Y 2
SFX 6322 ti a/560 . 350
SFX 6322 tis asi/560 . 350

SFX 6323 Y 2
SFX 6323 ti a/561 . 350
SFX 6323 tis asi/561 . 350

SFX 6324 Y 2
SFX 6324 ti a/562 . 350
SFX 6324 tis asi/562 . 350

SFX 6334 Y 1
SFX 6334 ti ie/563 . 350

SFX 6335 Y 1
SFX 6335 tis ie/564 . 350

SFX 6336 Y 2
SFX 6336 ti ė/565 . 351
SFX 6336 tis ėsi/565 . 351

SFX 6337 Y 2
SFX 6337 ti ė/566 . 351
SFX 6337 tis ėsi/566 . 351

SFX 6338 Y 2
SFX 6338 ti ė/567 . 351
SFX 6338 tis ėsi/567 . 351

SFX 6342 Y 2
SFX 6342 ti ti/544 . 349
SFX 6342 tis tis/544 . 349

SFX 6343 Y 2
SFX 6343 ti ti/545 . 349
SFX 6343 tis tis/545 . 349

SFX 6344 Y 2
SFX 6344 ti ti/546 . 349
SFX 6344 tis tis/546 . 349

SFX 6345 Y 2
SFX 6345 ti ti/547 . 349
SFX 6345 tis tis/547 . 349

SFX 6346 Y 2
SFX 6346 ti ti/548 . 349
SFX 6346 tis tis/548 . 349

SFX 6347 Y 2
SFX 6347 ti ti/549 . 349
SFX 6347 tis tis/549 . 349

SFX 6348 Y 2
SFX 6348 ti ti/550 . 349
SFX 6348 tis tis/550 . 349

SFX 6349 Y 2
SFX 6349 ti ti/551 . 349
SFX 6349 tis tis/551 . 349

SFX 6350 Y 2
SFX 6350 ti ti/552 . 349
SFX 6350 tis tis/552 . 349

SFX 6351 Y 2
SFX 6351 ti ti/553 . 349
SFX 6351 tis tis/553 . 349

SFX 6362 Y 2
SFX 6362 ti 0/554 . 350
SFX 6362 tis si/554 . 350

SFX 6363 Y 2
SFX 6363 ti 0/555 . 350
SFX 6363 tis si/555 . 350

SFX 6364 Y 2
SFX 6364 ti 0/556 . 350
SFX 6364 tis si/556 . 350

SFX 6365 Y 2
SFX 6365 ti 0/557 . 350
SFX 6365 tis si/557 . 350

SFX 6366 Y 2
SFX 6366 ti 0/558 . 350
SFX 6366 tis si/558 . 350

SFX 6367 Y 2
SFX 6367 ti 0/559 . 350
SFX 6367 tis si/559 . 350

SFX 6368 Y 2
SFX 6368 ti 0/560 . 350
SFX 6368 tis si/560 . 350

SFX 6369 Y 2
SFX 6369 ti 0/561 . 350
SFX 6369 tis si/561 . 350

SFX 6370 Y 2
SFX 6370 ti 0/562 . 350
SFX 6370 tis si/562 . 350

SFX 6380 Y 1
SFX 6380 oti ai/563 . 350

SFX 6381 Y 1
SFX 6381 otis ai/564 . 350

SFX 6382 Y 2
SFX 6382 ti jo/565 . 351
SFX 6382 tis josi/565 . 351

SFX 6383 Y 2
SFX 6383 ti jo/566 . 351
SFX 6383 tis josi/566 . 351

SFX 6384 Y 2
SFX 6384 ti jo/567 . 351
SFX 6384 tis josi/567 . 351

SFX 6388 Y 2
SFX 6388 sti sti/544 . 349
SFX 6388 stis stis/544 . 349

SFX 6389 Y 2
SFX 6389 sti sti/545 . 349
SFX 6389 stis stis/545 . 349

SFX 6390 Y 2
SFX 6390 sti sti/546 . 349
SFX 6390 stis stis/546 . 349

SFX 6391 Y 2
SFX 6391 sti sti/547 . 349
SFX 6391 stis stis/547 . 349

SFX 6392 Y 2
SFX 6392 sti sti/548 . 349
SFX 6392 stis stis/548 . 349

SFX 6393 Y 2
SFX 6393 sti sti/549 . 349
SFX 6393 stis stis/549 . 349

SFX 6394 Y 2
SFX 6394 sti sti/550 . 349
SFX 6394 stis stis/550 . 349

SFX 6395 Y 2
SFX 6395 sti sti/551 . 349
SFX 6395 stis stis/551 . 349

SFX 6396 Y 2
SFX 6396 sti sti/552 . 349
SFX 6396 stis stis/552 . 349

SFX 6397 Y 2
SFX 6397 sti sti/553 . 349
SFX 6397 stis stis/553 . 349

SFX 6408 Y 2
SFX 6408 sti džia/554 . 350
SFX 6408 stis džiasi/554 . 350

SFX 6409 Y 2
SFX 6409 sti džia/555 . 350
SFX 6409 stis džiasi/555 . 350

SFX 6410 Y 2
SFX 6410 sti džia/556 . 350
SFX 6410 stis džiasi/556 . 350

SFX 6411 Y 2
SFX 6411 sti džia/557 . 350
SFX 6411 stis džiasi/557 . 350

SFX 6412 Y 2
SFX 6412 sti džia/558 . 350
SFX 6412 stis džiasi/558 . 350

SFX 6413 Y 2
SFX 6413 sti džia/559 . 350
SFX 6413 stis džiasi/559 . 350

SFX 6414 Y 2
SFX 6414 sti džia/560 . 350
SFX 6414 stis džiasi/560 . 350

SFX 6415 Y 2
SFX 6415 sti džia/561 . 350
SFX 6415 stis džiasi/561 . 350

SFX 6416 Y 2
SFX 6416 sti džia/562 . 350
SFX 6416 stis džiasi/562 . 350

SFX 6426 Y 1
SFX 6426 sti die/563 . 350

SFX 6427 Y 1
SFX 6427 stis die/564 . 350

SFX 6428 Y 2
SFX 6428 sti dė/565 . 351
SFX 6428 stis dėsi/565 . 351

SFX 6429 Y 2
SFX 6429 sti dė/566 . 351
SFX 6429 stis dėsi/566 . 351

SFX 6430 Y 2
SFX 6430 sti dė/567 . 351
SFX 6430 stis dėsi/567 . 351

SFX 6434 Y 2
SFX 6434 ti ti/544 . 349
SFX 6434 tis tis/544 . 349

SFX 6435 Y 2
SFX 6435 ti ti/545 . 349
SFX 6435 tis tis/545 . 349

SFX 6436 Y 2
SFX 6436 ti ti/546 . 349
SFX 6436 tis tis/546 . 349

SFX 6437 Y 2
SFX 6437 ti ti/547 . 349
SFX 6437 tis tis/547 . 349

SFX 6438 Y 2
SFX 6438 ti ti/548 . 349
SFX 6438 tis tis/548 . 349

SFX 6439 Y 2
SFX 6439 ti ti/549 . 349
SFX 6439 tis tis/549 . 349

SFX 6440 Y 2
SFX 6440 ti ti/550 . 349
SFX 6440 tis tis/550 . 349

SFX 6441 Y 2
SFX 6441 ti ti/551 . 349
SFX 6441 tis tis/551 . 349

SFX 6442 Y 2
SFX 6442 ti ti/552 . 349
SFX 6442 tis tis/552 . 349

SFX 6443 Y 2
SFX 6443 ti ti/553 . 349
SFX 6443 tis tis/553 . 349

SFX 6454 Y 2
SFX 6454 ti ta/554 . 350
SFX 6454 tis tasi/554 . 350

SFX 6455 Y 2
SFX 6455 ti ta/555 . 350
SFX 6455 tis tasi/555 . 350

SFX 6456 Y 2
SFX 6456 ti ta/556 . 350
SFX 6456 tis tasi/556 . 350

SFX 6457 Y 2
SFX 6457 ti ta/557 . 350
SFX 6457 tis tasi/557 . 350

SFX 6458 Y 2
SFX 6458 ti ta/558 . 350
SFX 6458 tis tasi/558 . 350

SFX 6459 Y 2
SFX 6459 ti ta/559 . 350
SFX 6459 tis tasi/559 . 350

SFX 6460 Y 2
SFX 6460 ti ta/560 . 350
SFX 6460 tis tasi/560 . 350

SFX 6461 Y 2
SFX 6461 ti ta/561 . 350
SFX 6461 tis tasi/561 . 350

SFX 6462 Y 2
SFX 6462 ti ta/562 . 350
SFX 6462 tis tasi/562 . 350

SFX 6472 Y 1
SFX 6472 ti tie/563 . 350

SFX 6473 Y 1
SFX 6473 tis tie/564 . 350

SFX 6474 Y 2
SFX 6474 ti o/565 . 351
SFX 6474 tis osi/565 . 351

SFX 6475 Y 2
SFX 6475 ti o/566 . 351
SFX 6475 tis osi/566 . 351

SFX 6476 Y 2
SFX 6476 ti o/567 . 351
SFX 6476 tis osi/567 . 351

SFX 6480 Y 2
SFX 6480 kti kti/544 . 349
SFX 6480 ktis ktis/544 . 349

SFX 6481 Y 2
SFX 6481 kti kti/545 . 349
SFX 6481 ktis ktis/545 . 349

SFX 6482 Y 2
SFX 6482 kti kti/546 . 349
SFX 6482 ktis ktis/546 . 349

SFX 6483 Y 2
SFX 6483 kti kti/547 . 349
SFX 6483 ktis ktis/547 . 349

SFX 6484 Y 2
SFX 6484 kti kti/548 . 349
SFX 6484 ktis ktis/548 . 349

AF 6250,6251,6270,6290,65521 # 77
AF 6480,6481,6500,6520,65521 # 98
AF 6296,6297,6316,6336,65521 # 128
AF 6388,6389,6408,6428,65521 # 130
AF 6434,6435,6454,6474,65521 # 156
AF 6342,6343,6362,6382,65521 # 158
AF 6388,6389,6397,6408,6416,6428,6430,65521 # 275
AF 6388,6389,6390,6391,6392,6393,6394,6395,6396,6397,6408,6409,6410,6411,6412,6413,6414,6415,6416,6426,6427,6428,6429,6430,65521 # 343
AF 6342,6343,6347,6362,6366,6382,65521 # 357
AF 6296,6297,6305,6316,6324,6336,6338,65521 # 361
AF 6250,6251,6259,6270,6278,6290,6292,65521 # 393
AF 6388,6389,6390,6393,6408,6409,6412,6428,65521 # 475
AF 6434,6435,6443,6454,6462,6474,6476,65521 # 512
AF 6342,6343,6344,6347,6362,6363,6366,6382,65521 # 527
