lt_LT.dic
aptekti/98	12
apšerkšnyti/77	12
atlūžti/156	12
atsitikti/98	14
atskuosti/130	12
barti/128	12
bausti/275	12
belūžti/156	12
besiskleisti/130	14
bežinoti/158	12
biržyti/77	12
diržti/156	12
geisti/343	12
gunksoti/158	12
ieškoti/357	12
išakyti/77	12
išaušti/156	12
iškalti/361	12
iškasti/361	12
iškrikti/98	12
išpešti/128	12
išsiausti/130	14
išsigiedryti/77	14
ištįsti/156	12
kaboti/158	12
kniūbsoti/158	12
krikštyti/393	12
neapibarti/128	34
neapledyti/77	34
neaplūžti/156	34
neapsidrausti/130	35
neapsmukti/98	34
nebeatlyžti/156	34
nebeatskleisti/130	34
nebebijoti/158	34
nebegulti/128	34
nebeišsitekti/98	35
nebekeršyti/77	34
nebelūžti/156	34
nebepaguosti/130	34
nebeparvežti/128	34
nebepražiopsoti/158	34
nebepritikti/98	34
nebesinuodyti/77	35
nebeskiesti/130	34
nebespoksoti/158	34
nebesuplakti/128	34
nebetūnoti/158	34
nebeužuosti/130	34
nebeįsmukti/98	34
nebeįvardyti/77	34
negrįžti/156	34
neišpešti/128	34
nekeršyti/77	34
nekėpsoti/158	34
nemalšti/156	34
nenukvakti/98	34
nenusegti/128	34
nenusnausti/130	34
nepasikepti/128	35
nepasiryžti/156	35
neperkrikštyti/77	34
neplikti/98	34
nepridegti/128	34
neprisižaisti/130	35
nepūpsoti/158	34
nesiplakti/128	35
neskiepyti/77	34
nesuirzti/156	34
nesusipersti/130	35
nesusižinoti/158	35
nesutikti/98	34
neuždegti/128	34
neįsivardyti/77	35
neįsmukti/98	34
neįtūžti/156	34
neįžeisti/130	34
neštis/128	14
nuausti/275	12
nusišypsoti/158	14
pakepti/128	12
pamiršti/156	12
partekti/98	12
pasimūryti/77	14
pasižaisti/130	14
pažeisti/475	12
pažiopsoti/158	12
pernešti/128	12
prakasti/361	12
prasegti/361	12
prilakti/128	12
prisižaisti/130	14
pritikti/98	12
sarmatyti/77	12
smarksoti/158	12
sudiržti/156	12
susižaisti/130	14
sutikti/98	12
tauzyti/77	12
tebedunksoti/158	12
tebemalti/128	12
tebesekti/98	12
tebestypsoti/158	12
tebežiesti/130	12
tegaišti/156	12
tenebijoti/158	34
tepatekti/98	12
teįvežti/128	12
tikti/98	12
tysoti/158	12
tįsti/156	12
uždrausti/275	12
užkniedyti/77	12
užmiršti/512	12
užskleisti/130	12
įtikti/98	12
čiustyti/77	12
žinoti/527	12
